District of Columbia statutes.
32-1455

Enforcement.

(a)

If an employer fails to comply with the provisions of this chapter, the Mayor shall assess a civil fine of $1,000 for the first violation, $5,000 for the second violation, and $20,000 for each subsequent violation.

(b)

Adjudication for a violation of this chapter shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2[§ 2-1801.01 et seq.].

(c)

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to create a private right of action.

Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-219, § 6, 62 DCR 9